Texas statutes.
AGRICULTURE CODE

TITLE 3. AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH AND PROMOTION

CHAPTER 50D. TEXAS OLIVE OIL INDUSTRY ADVISORY BOARD

Sec. 50D.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "board" means the Texas Olive Oil Industry Advisory Board.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 5 (S.B. 743), Sec. 1, eff. April 25, 2019.

Sec. 50D.002. BOARD. (a) The board is composed of the following nine members appointed by the commissioner:

(1) five members who are olive growers, one of whom represents each of the five established olive-growing regions of the state as determined by the commissioner;

(2) one representative of infrastructure who is engaged in harvesting, milling, or agritourism;

(3) one researcher or educator who is employed by an institution of higher education, as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code;

(4) one representative from the Texas A&M AgriLife Extension Service; and

(5) one representative from the department.

(b) The board shall elect a presiding officer from among its members.

(c) Members of the board serve staggered six-year terms, with the terms of three members expiring on February 1 of each odd-numbered year. Members may be reappointed at the end of a term.

(d) Chapter 2110, Government Code, does not apply to the size, composition, or duration of the board.

(e) Service on the board by a state officer or employee is an additional duty of the member's office or employment. Members of the board are not entitled to compensation or reimbursement of expenses.

(f) The board may accept gifts and grants from any source to be used to carry out a function of the board.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 5 (S.B. 743), Sec. 1, eff. April 25, 2019.

Sec. 50D.003. DUTIES. The board shall:

(1) assist the department in:

(A) assessing the state of the olive and olive oil industry in this state;

(B) developing recommendations to the commissioner and the legislature to promote and expand the olive and olive oil industry in this state;

(C) identifying and obtaining grants and gifts to promote and expand the olive and olive oil industry in this state; and

(D) developing a long-term vision and marketable identity for the olive and olive oil industry in this state that take into consideration future industry development, funding, research, educational programming, risk management, and marketing; and

(2) review and provide guidance on rules impacting the olive and olive oil industry in this state.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 5 (S.B. 743), Sec. 1, eff. April 25, 2019.

Sec. 50D.004. MEETINGS. The board shall meet twice each year and may meet at other times considered necessary by the commissioner.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 5 (S.B. 743), Sec. 1, eff. April 25, 2019.

Sec. 50D.005. STAFF. The board is administratively attached to the department. The department shall provide the board with the staff necessary to carry out the board's duties under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 5 (S.B. 743), Sec. 1, eff. April 25, 2019.